Hawaii statutes.
§431:14-103.3 Rate adjustment mandates.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, the commissioner may mandate insurers
to submit new filings for any type of insurance under section 431:14-102 when
the commissioner has actuarially sound information that current rates may be
excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory.

(b) Insurers shall submit the new rate filings
within one hundred twenty days of the commissioner's mandate.

(c) The new rate filings shall be subject to
the rate filing requirements under section 431:14-104.

(d) After the commissioner reviews the new
rate filings submitted under this section, if the commissioner finds that the
rates are excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory, the commissioner
may adjust the rates for any class of insurance for any insurer pursuant to
subsections (e) and (f).

(e) If, any time subsequent to the applicable
review period provided for in sections 431:14-104 and 431:14-120, the
commissioner does not approve a new rate filing by an insurer, the commissioner
shall issue a written notice of disapproval of the filed rate to the insurer.
The written notice shall set forth the commissioner's proposed rate and the
actuarial, statutory, factual, and legal bases for both the disapproval of the
rate filed by the insurer and the commissioner's proposed rate. Within thirty
days of the commissioner's written notice of disapproval, the insurer may file
a written request to the commissioner for a hearing pursuant to subsection (f);
provided that:

(1) If the insurer fails to file a written request
for hearing, the commissioner's proposed rate shall become effective sixty days
after the expiration of the deadline to file a written request for a hearing;
and

(2) If the insurer files a written request for a
hearing, the existing effective rate shall remain in effect until sixty days
after the final order is rendered by the director of commerce and consumer
affairs and the appeals process has been exhausted.

(f) The hearing allowed under subsection (e)
shall be conducted under the following procedure:

(1) The hearing shall commence within twenty days of
receipt of the written demand for a hearing, and written notice of the hearing
shall be provided to the parties not less than ten days prior to the hearing;

(2) The commissioner shall present the commissioner's
proposed rate and the insurer shall present its rate filing, in addition to
other relevant evidence;

(3) Within fifteen days after the conclusion of the
hearing, the hearings officer shall issue a proposed decision; and

(4) The rate found to be in compliance with this
article shall be effective sixty days after the final order is rendered by the
director of commerce and consumer affairs and the appeals process has been
exhausted. [L 1998, c 117, §1; am L 2012, c 258, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next